Hawaii statutes.
§641-13 By State in criminal cases. An
appeal may be taken by and on behalf of the State from the district or circuit
courts to the intermediate appellate court, subject to chapter 602, in all
criminal matters, in the following instances:

(1) From an order or judgment quashing, setting
aside, or sustaining a motion to dismiss any indictment, information, or
complaint or any count thereof;

(2) From an order or judgment sustaining a special
plea in bar or dismissing the case where the defendant has not been put in
jeopardy;

(3) From an order granting a new trial;

(4) From an order arresting judgment;

(5) From a ruling on a question of law adverse to the
State, where the defendant was convicted and appeals from the judgment;

(6) From the sentence, on the ground that it is
illegal;

(7) From a pretrial order granting a motion for the
suppression of evidence, including a confession or admission, or the return of
property, in which case the appellate court shall give priority to the appeal
and the order shall be stayed pending the outcome of the appeal;

(8) From an order denying a request by the State for
protective order for nondisclosure of witness for reason of personal safety
under rule 16(e)(4) of the Hawaii rules of penal procedure, in which case the
appellate court shall give priority to the appeal and the order shall be stayed
pending outcome of the appeal;

(9) From a judgment of acquittal following a jury
verdict of guilty; and

(10) From a denial of an application for an order of
approval or authorization of the interception of a wire, oral, or electronic
communication pursuant to section 803‑44. [L 1911, c 40, §1; RL 1925,
§2522; am L 1931, c 37, §2; RL 1935, §3551; RL 1945, §9552; RL 1955, §212-2;
HRS §641-12; am L 1972, c 148, §1; ren HRS §641-13; am L 1977, c 146, §1; am L
1979, c 111, §6(4); am L 1982, c 81, §1; am L 1987, c 84, §1; am L 2004, c 62,
§2 and c 202, §70; am L 2006, c 94, §1 and c 200, §3; am L 2010, c 109, §1]

Rules of Court

Appeals, when taken, see HRAP rule 4.

Case Notes

Remand after reversal of ruling sustaining demurrer. 23 H.
409 (1916).

Special plea in bar, sustaining of, what constitutes. 25 H.
55 (1919); 47 H. 361, 389 P.2d 439 (1964). See 39 H. 522 (1952).

No appeal by State from ruling on question of law unless
defendant convicted and appeals. 34 H. 662 (1938).

Oral ruling of district magistrate constitutes an order
within the meaning of this section. 41 H. 591 (1957).

No right to review after acquittal of accused by verdict of
jury. 42 H. 102 (1957).

Appeal by State from oral order of circuit court dismissing
indictment is nugatory. 45 H. 501, 370 P.2d 480 (1962).

Pretrial order to suppress evidence; "special plea in
bar" construed. 50 H. 525, 445 P.2d 36 (1968).

When State appeals from the quashing of an indictment,
defendant is still subject to original requirements of bail. 53 H. 76, 488
P.2d 329 (1971).

Conditional discharge of defendant under §712-1255 is not a
final disposition of the case appealable by the State. 60 H. 576, 592 P.2d 832
(1979).

Stipulation for joint hearing on motion to suppress and trial
on merits is not a waiver by State of its right to appeal from ruling on motion
to suppress. 62 H. 44, 609 P.2d 131 (1980).

Under circumstances, jeopardy did not attach even though jury
was sworn. 64 H. 395, 641 P.2d 1338 (1982).

Jeopardy did not attach where case dismissed after defendant
arraigned but before State's first witness sworn. 68 H. 238, 709 P.2d 607
(1985).

State could appeal only under paragraph (2) where case dismissed
after all evidence taken. 68 H. 653, 729 P.2d 385 (1986).

Deferred acceptance of guilty and deferred acceptance of no
contest pleas are not appealable. 69 H. 438, 746 P.2d 568 (1987).

Authorizes appellate jurisdiction to review orders granting
pretrial motions to suppress. 70 H. 206, 767 P.2d 1238 (1989).

Language does not allow an appeal from a sentence on the
ground that the sentence was imposed in an illegal manner, but allows an appeal
from an illegal sentence. 71 H. 624, 801 P.2d 558 (1990).

State's right to appeal in criminal cases is limited to
instances stated in section; section does not give State right to appeal from
granting of deferred acceptance of guilty or deferred acceptance of no contest
pleas. 74 H. 75, 837 P.2d 776 (1992).

While it is necessary for "entire case" to be
dismissed for paragraph (2) to apply, there is nothing in the language of this
section to indicate that this would prevent paragraph (1) from applying;
prosecution not barred from bringing appeal of dismissal of counts of
indictment, where counts dismissed after trial began because counts did not
include essential elements of offenses charged. 78 H. 373, 894 P.2d 70 (1995).

In a jury trial, issues decided by the judge are
"questions of law" appealable under this section, while issues
decided by the jury are "questions of fact" and are not appealable.
85 H. 462, 946 P.2d 32 (1997).

As defendant's "motion to dismiss" following a jury
verdict of guilty deemed post-verdict motion for judgment of acquittal
following a jury verdict of guilty pursuant to HRPP rule 29(c), paragraph (9)
authorized prosecution to assert appeal from this judgment of acquittal; thus,
supreme court had appellate jurisdiction over appeal. 87 H. 108, 952 P.2d 865
(1997).

Double jeopardy clauses not violated by prosecution's appeal
from judgment of acquittal following jury's verdict of guilty pursuant to
paragraph (9). 87 H. 108, 952 P.2d 865 (1997).

Paragraph (1) permits prosecution to appeal from both
dismissals with prejudice and without prejudice. 87 H. 260, 953 P.2d 1358
(1998).

Where trial court's order was an order of dismissal and not a
judgment of acquittal, order was appealable under paragraph (1). 97 H. 505, 40
P.3d 907 (2002).

Paragraph (7) authorizes the prosecution to appeal orders
suppressing evidence as illegally obtained, the intent of the statute being to
facilitate the administration of justice in criminal cases by allowing the
prosecution to obtain a conclusive ruling on issues involving searches, seizures,
and confessions via direct appeal. 104 H. 224, 87 P.3d 893 (2004).

The language of paragraph (7), which allows the prosecution
to appeal from "a pretrial order granting a motion for the suppression of
evidence", includes within its scope the right to appeal from a trial
court’s voluntariness determination mandated by §621-26. 104 H. 224, 87 P.3d
893 (2004).

As district family court proceedings under §571-11(1)
concerning juvenile law violators are considered to be noncriminal proceedings,
prosecution's appeal of family court order was not authorized by paragraph
(7). 104 H. 403, 91 P.3d 485 (2004).

As the prosecution was not authorized to appeal the judge's
pretrial discovery order under this section, the prosecution, as mandamus
petitioner, would have been without a remedy unless extraordinary relief was
granted; where trial judge did not exceed judge's authority under HRPP rule
16(d) by ordering the disclosure of the information on the laser unit
calibration distances and locations in prosecution of defendant for speeding,
petition for writ of mandamus was denied. 116 H. 23, 169 P.3d 975 (2007).

Where the case was a criminal matter filed by plaintiff State
of Hawaii against defendant and the police department (HPD) was not a party to
the case, HPD, as a nonparty, was not authorized to appeal the respondent
judge's order denying HPD's motion to quash defendant's subpoena duces tecum
pursuant to §641-11 if judgment was entered against defendant; HPD was also not
authorized to appeal the order pursuant to the interlocutory appeal statute for
defendants, §641-17, or the appeal statute for the prosecution under this
section; thus, having no remedy by way of appeal, HPD properly sought redress
from the order by mandamus. 122 H. 204, 225 P.3d 646 (2010).

Deferred acceptance of no contest plea not appealable until
no contest plea accepted. 5 H. App. 357, 692 P.2d 1171 (1984).

Section is to be strictly construed. 7 H. App. 516, 782 P.2d
29 (1989).

Paragraph (9) did not preclude appellate court's jurisdiction
over State's appeal where trial court's judgment of acquittal was "in form
only and not in substance"; trial court made no factual determination as
to some or all of the elements charged, but grounded its ruling on the
conclusion that the charges were defective as a matter of law. 88 H. 477
(App.), 967 P.2d 674 (1998).

Cited: 37 H. 601, 603 (1947); 48 H. 247, 256, 397 P.2d 575
(1964).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next